Hawaii statutes.
[Part IVA. honey]

§328-79 Home-based agricultural producer of
honey; exemption. (a) A home-based agricultural producer of honey shall
not be required to process honey in a certified honey house or food processing
establishment, or be required to obtain a permit from the department, if the
producer:

(1) Sells less than five hundred gallons of honey a
year;

(2) Sells the honey directly to consumers or directly
to a retail store that in turn sells the honey directly to consumers;

(3) Labels each container of honey sold with:

(A) The name and address of the producer;

(B) The net weight and volume of the honey,
by standard measure;

(C) The date the honey was produced;

(D) The statement, "Honey should not be
consumed by infants under one year of age." in clear and conspicuous
print; and

(E) The statement, "This product is
home-produced and processed and has not been inspected by the Department of
Health." in clear and conspicuous print;

(4) Attends a department of health approved food
safety workshop and passes the food safety certification exam; and

(5) Keeps honey production volume and honey product
distribution records for a period of at least two years and makes the records
available to the department.

(b) The State and counties shall not be liable
for claims associated with honey distributed by home-based agricultural
producers of honey; except for instances of gross negligence and intentional
misconduct by the State or counties. [L 2005, c 63, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 131,
§2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next